Utah statutes.
62A-15-635.   Notice of commitment.

Whenever a patient has been temporarily, involuntarily committed to a local mental health authority pursuant to Section 62A-15-629 on the application of any person other than his legal guardian, spouse, or next of kin, the local mental health authority or its designee shall immediately notify the patient's legal guardian, spouse, or next of kin, if known.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

